Utah statutes.
78B-6-1240.   Investment of securities by court clerk -- Accounting.
The clerk of the court in whose name a security is taken or by whom an
investment is made, and his successors in office, shall receive the interest
and principal as it becomes due, and apply and invest the same as the court
may direct.  The clerk shall also deposit with the county treasurer all
securities taken, and keep an account, in a book provided and kept for that
purpose in the clerk's office, free to inspection by all persons, of
investments and money received and their disposition.
